District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.07

Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter and §§ 43-119 and 43-125 shall be construed so as to affect the authority vested in the Mayor by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. The performance of any function vested by this subchapter and §§ 43-119 and 43-125 in the Mayor or in any office or agency under the jurisdiction and control of said Mayor may be delegated by said Mayor in accordance with § 3 of such Plan.

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 87-656, § 13
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818,§ 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 2-260.
1981 Ed., § 2-1607.